Illinois, session 104th, SB1543.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   SB1543- 2 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   SB1543- 3 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   SB1543- 4 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   SB1543- 5 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   SB1543- 6 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   SB1543- 7 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   SB1543- 8 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   SB1543- 9 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   SB1543- 10 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   SB1543- 11 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   SB1543- 12 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   SB1543- 13 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   SB1543- 14 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   SB1543- 15 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   SB1543- 16 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   SB1543- 17 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   SB1543- 18 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in   SB1543- 19 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 10        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 11        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;12            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 13        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 14        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 15        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 17        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 18        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 19        held under claim of right for the taxable year;20            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 21        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 22        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 23        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 24        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 25        illness;26            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or   SB1543- 20 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;2            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 3        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 4        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 5        medical care savings account established under the 6        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 7        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 8        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 9        as provided in that Act;10            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 11        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 12        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 13        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 14        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 15        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 16        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);17            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 18        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 19        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 20        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 21        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 22        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;23            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 25        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 26        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed   SB1543- 21 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 2        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 3        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 4        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 5        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 6        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 7        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 8        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 9        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 10        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 11        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 12        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 13        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 14        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 15        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 16        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 17        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 18        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 19        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 20        times a number that represents the fractional 21        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 22        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 23        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;24            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 25        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 26        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year   SB1543- 22 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 2        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 6        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 7        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 8        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 9        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 10        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 11        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 12        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 13        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 14        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 15        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 16        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 17        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 18        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 19        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 20        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 21        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 22        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 23        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 24        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 25        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 26        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this   SB1543- 23 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 2        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 3        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 4        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 5        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 6        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 7        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 8        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 9        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 10        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 13        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 14        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 15        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 16        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 18        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 19        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 20        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 21        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 22        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 23        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 24        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 26        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes   SB1543- 24 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 2        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 3        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 4        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 7        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 8        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 9        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 10        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 11        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:12                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 13            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 14            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 15            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 16            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 17            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 18            including the bonus depreciation deduction;19                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 20            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 21            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 22            0.429); and23                (3) for taxable years ending after December 24            31, 2005:25                    (i) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted   SB1543- 25 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 3                by 0.429);4                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                1.0;8                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 11                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 12                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 13                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 14                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 15                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 16                depreciation on that property; and17                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 19                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 20                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 21                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 22                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 23                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 24                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 25                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 26                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)).   SB1543- 26 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            The aggregate amount deducted under this 2        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 3        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 4        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 5        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 6        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 7        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 13        an amount equal to that addition modification. 14            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 15        the last day of the last tax year for which a 16        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 17        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 18        required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification. 21            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 22        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 23        one piece of property.24            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250;26            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income,   SB1543- 27 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        other than salary, received by a driver in a 2        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;3            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   SB1543- 28 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250; 15            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   SB1543- 29 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 9        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;10            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 11        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 12        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 13        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 14        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; 16            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   SB1543- 30 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 4        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 8        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 9        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 10        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 11        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 12        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 13        be considered moneys contributed under this 14        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 15        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 16        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 17        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 18            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 19        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 20        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 21        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 23        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 24        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 25        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 26        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code;   SB1543- 31 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250; and 14            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 16        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 17        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 18        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 19        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 20        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 21        another state; and 22            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 23        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 24        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 25        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 26        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal   SB1543- 32 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 2        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 3        during the taxable year from a qualified community 4        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 5        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 6        Act. 7            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250; . 9            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 11        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 12        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 13        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 14        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 15        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 16        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 17        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250; and . 19            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2026, the full amount of union dues paid by 21        the taxpayer during the taxable year if the taxpayer 22        was not allowed a federal deduction by operation of 23        Section 67 of the Internal Revenue Code. If any amount 24        of union dues representing federal miscellaneous 25        itemized deductions was allowed, then the amount 26        allowed as a deduction under this subparagraph (NN)   SB1543- 33 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        shall be a percentage of the union dues disallowed by 2        the operation of Section 67 of the Internal Revenue 3        Code computed by multiplying the total union dues paid 4        by the taxpayer during the taxable year by a 5        percentage determined by subtracting from one a 6        fraction where the numerator is the amount of federal 7        miscellaneous deductions allowed and the denominator 8        is the aggregate federal miscellaneous itemized 9        deductions before application of the 2% floor under 10        Section 67 of the Internal Revenue Code. As used in 11        this subparagraph (NN), union dues are those amounts 12        that are deductible as union dues and agency shop fees 13        under Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 14        subparagraph (NN) is exempt from the provisions of 15        Section 250.  16    (b) Corporations.17        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 18    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 19    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).20        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 21    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 22    of the following amounts:23            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 24        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 25        received from regulated investment companies during   SB1543- 34 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 2        income in the computation of taxable income;3            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 4        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 5        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 6        year;7            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 8        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 9        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 10        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 11        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 12        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 13        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 14        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 15        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 16        law and is not a new enactment);17            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 18        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 19        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 20        ending prior to December 31, 1986;21            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 22        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 23        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 24        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 25        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 26        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other   SB1543- 35 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 2        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 3        year, with the following limitations applied in the 4        order that they are listed:5                (i) the addition modification relating to the 6            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 7            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 8            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 9            of addition modification under this subparagraph 10            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 11            which was taken into account in calculating the 12            base income of an earlier taxable year, and13                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 14            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 15            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 16            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 17            such carryback or carryforward;18            For taxable years in which there is a net 19        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 20        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 21        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 22        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 23        computed independently under the preceding provisions 24        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;25            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 26        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation   SB1543- 36 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 2        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 3        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;4            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 6        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 7        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 8        the Internal Revenue Code;9            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 13        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 14        deductions taken in all taxable years under 15        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.16            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 17        the last day of the last tax year for which a 18        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 19        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 20        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 21        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 22        equal to that subtraction modification. 23            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 24        modification under this subparagraph only once with 25        respect to any one piece of property;26            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise   SB1543- 37 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 2        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 3        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 4        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 5        member of the same unitary business group but for the 6        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 7        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 8        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 9        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 10        who would be a member of the same unitary business 11        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 12        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 13        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 14        required to apportion business income under different 15        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 16        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 17        extent that dividends were included in base income of 18        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 19        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 20        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 21        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 22        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 23        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 24        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 25        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 26        accrued, or incurred.   SB1543- 38 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 2                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 3            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 4            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 5            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 6            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 7            with respect to such interest; or8                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 11            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 12            following:13                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 14                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 15                to a person that is not a related member, and16                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 17                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 18                person did not have as a principal purpose the 19                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 20                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 21                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 22                terms; or 23                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 24            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 25            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 26            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates   SB1543- 39 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            and terms and the principal purpose for the 2            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 3            or 4                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 5            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 6            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 7            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 8            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 9            to the application or use of an alternative method 10            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 11                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 12            Director from making any other adjustment 13            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 14            for any tax year beginning after the effective 15            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 16            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 17            Department and such regulations provide methods 18            and standards by which the Department will utilize 19            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 20            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 21        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 22        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 23        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 24        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 25        foreign person who would be a member of the same 26        unitary business group but for the fact that the   SB1543- 40 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        foreign person's business activity outside the United 2        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 3        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 4        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 5        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 6        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 7        from being included in the unitary business group 8        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 9        business income under different subsections of Section 10        304. The addition modification required by this 11        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 12        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 13        group for the same taxable year and received by the 14        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 15        business group (including amounts included in gross 16        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 17        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 18        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 19        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 20        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 21        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 22        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 23        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 24        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 25        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 26        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses,   SB1543- 41 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 2        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 3        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 4        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 5        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 6        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 7        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 8        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 9        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 10        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 11        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 12        similar types of intangible assets.13            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:14                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 15            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 16            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 17            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 18            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 19            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 20            with respect to such item; or21                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 22            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 23            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 24            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 25            following:26                    (a) the person during the same taxable   SB1543- 42 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 2                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 3                not a related member, and4                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 5                intangible expense or cost between the 6                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 7                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 8                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 9                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 10                or11                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 12            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 13            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 14            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 15            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 16            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 17            writing to the application or use of an 18            alternative method of apportionment under Section 19            304(f); 20                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 21            Director from making any other adjustment 22            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 23            for any tax year beginning after the effective 24            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 25            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 26            Department and such regulations provide methods   SB1543- 43 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            and standards by which the Department will utilize 2            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 3            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 4        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 5        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 6        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 9        business group but for the fact that the person is 10        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 11        included in the unitary business group because he or 12        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 13        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 14        addition modification required by this subparagraph 15        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 16        included in base income of the unitary group for the 17        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 18        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 19        (including amounts included in gross income under 20        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 21        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 22        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 23        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 24        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 25        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 26        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to   SB1543- 44 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        the addition modification required under Section 2        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 3        Act; 4            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 5        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 6        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 7        to a real estate investment trust under Section 8        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 9        dividends paid;10            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 11        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 12        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 13        Act;14            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 15        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 16        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 17        for the taxable year; 18            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 19        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 20        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 21        Code for the taxable year; 22            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 23        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 24        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 25        Code for the taxable year; 26            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June   SB1543- 45 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 2        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 3        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 4            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 5        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 6        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 7        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 8        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 9        Tax Credit Act; 10    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 11    following amounts:12            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 13        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 14        and included in such total for the taxable year;15            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 16        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;17            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 18        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 19        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 20        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 21        for the taxable year;22            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 23        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 24        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 25        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 26        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal   SB1543- 46 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 2        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 3        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 4        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 5        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 6        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 7        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 8        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 9        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 10        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 11        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 12        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 13        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 14        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 15        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 16        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 17        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 18        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 19        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 20        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 21        from the provisions of Section 250;22            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 23        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 24        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 25        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 26        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any   SB1543- 47 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 2        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 3        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 4        net of bond premium amortization;5            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 6        such total which were paid by a corporation which 7        conducts business operations in a River Edge 8        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 9        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 10        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 11        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 12        the provisions of Section 250;13            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total that were paid by a corporation that 15        conducts business operations in a federally designated 16        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 17        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 18        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 19        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 20        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 21        this subparagraph (L);22            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 23        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 24        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 25        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 26        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by   SB1543- 48 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        property which is eligible for the River Edge 2        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 3        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 4        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 5        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 6        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 7        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 8        investment credit property which secures the loan or 9        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 10        such property on the date that it was placed in service 11        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 12        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 13        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 14        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 15        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 16        calculated under the previous sentence. This 17        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of 18        Section 250;19            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 20        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 21        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 22        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 23        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 24        property which is eligible for the High Impact 25        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 26        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible   SB1543- 49 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 2        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 3        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 4        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 5        investment credit property which secures the loan or 6        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 7        such property on the date that it was placed in service 8        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 9        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 10        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 11        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 12        eligible for the deduction provided under this 13        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 14        available to taxpayers in any year under this 15        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 16        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 17        attributable to the eligible property as calculated 18        under the previous sentence;19            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 20        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 21        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 22        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 23        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 24        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 25        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 26        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act   SB1543- 50 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 2        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 3        provisions of Section 250;4            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 5        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 6        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 7        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 8        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 9        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 10        income and received from a corporation that is not 11        created or organized under the laws of the United 12        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 13        including, for taxable years ending on or after 14        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 15        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 16        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 17        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph 18        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 19        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 20        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 21        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 22        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 23        included in taxable income and received, including, 24        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 25        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 26        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the   SB1543- 51 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 2        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 3        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 4        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 5        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 6        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 7        affiliated group which includes the dividend 8        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 9        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 10        this subsection (b) which is related to such 11        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 12        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 13        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 14        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 15        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 16        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 17        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This 18        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 19        Section 250 of this Act;20            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 21        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 22        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;23            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 24        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 25        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 26        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of   SB1543- 52 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        the Internal Revenue Code;2            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 3        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 4        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 5        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 6        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 7        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 8        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 9        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 10        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 11        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 12        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 13        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 14        Section 250;15            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 16        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 17        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a 18        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 19        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 20        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 21        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 22        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 23        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 24        provisions of Section 250;25            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 26        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction   SB1543- 53 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 2        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 3        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 4        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:5                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 6            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 7            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 8            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 9            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 10            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 11            including the bonus depreciation deduction;12                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 13            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 14            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 15            0.429); and16                (3) for taxable years ending after December 17            31, 2005:18                    (i) for property on which a bonus 19                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 20                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 21                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 22                by 0.429);23                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 24                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 25                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 26                1.0;  SB1543- 54 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 4                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 5                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 6                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 7                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 8                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 9                depreciation on that property; and10                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 11                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 12                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 13                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 14                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 15                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 16                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 17                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 18                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 19                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 20            The aggregate amount deducted under this 21        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 22        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 23        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 24        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 25        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 26        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of   SB1543- 55 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        Section 250;2            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 3        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 4        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 5        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 6        equal to that addition modification.7            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 8        the last day of the last tax year for which a 9        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 10        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 11        required in any taxable year to make an addition 12        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 13        equal to that addition modification. 14            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 15        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 16        one piece of property.17            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 18        provisions of Section 250;19            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 20        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 21        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 22        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 23        modification with respect to such transaction under 24        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 25        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 26        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any   SB1543- 56 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 2        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 3        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 4        that is required to make an addition modification with 5        respect to such transaction under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 7        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 8        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 9        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 10        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 11        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 12        an addition modification with respect to such 13        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 14        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 15        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 16        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 17        from the provisions of Section 250; 18            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 19        into account for the taxable year (net of the 20        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 21        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 23        for the fact that the foreign person's business 24        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 25        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 26        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to   SB1543- 57 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 2        business group but for the fact that the person is 3        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 4        included in the unitary business group because he or 5        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 6        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 7        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 8        made for the same taxable year under Section 9        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 10        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 11        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 12        Section 250; 13            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 14        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 15        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 16        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 17        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 18        for the fact that the foreign person's business 19        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 20        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 21        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 22        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 23        business group but for the fact that the person is 24        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 25        included in the unitary business group because he or 26        she is ordinarily required to apportion business   SB1543- 58 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 2        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 3        made for the same taxable year under Section 4        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 5        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 6        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 7        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 8            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 9        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 10        add back any insurance premiums under Section 11        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 12        that part of a reimbursement received from the 13        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 14        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 15        company) that would have been taken into account as a 16        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 17        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 18        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 19        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 20        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 21        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 22        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250; 24            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 25        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 26        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the   SB1543- 59 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 2        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 3        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 4        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 5        provisions of Section 250; and 6            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 8        operating in this State and licensed under the 9        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 10        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 11        organization operating in this State and licensed 12        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 13        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 14        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 15        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 16        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250. 19        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 20    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 21    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 22    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 23    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 24    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 25    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 26    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.   SB1543- 60 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1    (c) Trusts and estates.2        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 3    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 4    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).5        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 6    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 7    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 8    following amounts:9            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 10        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 11        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 12        in the computation of taxable income;13            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 14        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 15        required to distribute all of its income currently, 16        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 17        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 18        the computation of taxable income;19            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 20        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 21        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 22        year;23            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 24        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 25        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year   SB1543- 61 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        ending prior to December 31, 1986;2            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 3        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 4        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 5        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 6        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 7        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 8        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 9        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 10        the following limitations applied in the order that 11        they are listed:12                (i) the addition modification relating to the 13            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 14            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 15            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 16            of addition modification under this subparagraph 17            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 18            which was taken into account in calculating the 19            base income of an earlier taxable year, and20                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 21            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 22            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 23            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 24            such carryback or carryforward;25            For taxable years in which there is a net 26        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more   SB1543- 62 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 2        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 3        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 4        computed independently under the preceding provisions 5        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;6            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 7        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 8        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 9        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 10        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 11        of this Act;12            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 13        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 14        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 15        computation of taxable income;16            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 17        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 18        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 19        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 20        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 21        201;22            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 23        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 24        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 25        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 26        the Internal Revenue Code; and  SB1543- 63 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 2        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 3        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 4        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 5        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 6        deductions taken in all taxable years under 7        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.8            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 9        the last day of the last tax year for which a 10        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 11        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 12        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 13        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 14        equal to that subtraction modification. 15            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 16        modification under this subparagraph only once with 17        respect to any one piece of property;18            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 19        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 20        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 21        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 22        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 23        member of the same unitary business group but for the 24        fact that the foreign person's business activity 25        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 26        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable   SB1543- 64 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 2        who would be a member of the same unitary business 3        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 4        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 5        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 6        required to apportion business income under different 7        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 8        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 9        extent that dividends were included in base income of 10        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 11        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 12        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 13        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 14        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 15        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 16        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 17        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 18        accrued, or incurred. 19            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 20                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 21            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 22            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 23            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 24            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 25            with respect to such interest; or26                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or   SB1543- 65 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 2            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 3            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 4            following:5                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 6                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 7                to a person that is not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 10                person did not have as a principal purpose the 11                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 12                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 13                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 14                terms; or 15                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 16            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 17            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 18            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 19            and terms and the principal purpose for the 20            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 21            or 22                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 23            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 24            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 25            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 26            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing   SB1543- 66 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            to the application or use of an alternative method 2            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 3                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 4            Director from making any other adjustment 5            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 6            for any tax year beginning after the effective 7            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 8            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 9            Department and such regulations provide methods 10            and standards by which the Department will utilize 11            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 12            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 13        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 14        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 15        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 16        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 17        foreign person who would be a member of the same 18        unitary business group but for the fact that the 19        foreign person's business activity outside the United 20        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 21        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 22        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 23        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 24        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 25        from being included in the unitary business group 26        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion   SB1543- 67 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        business income under different subsections of Section 2        304. The addition modification required by this 3        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 4        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 5        group for the same taxable year and received by the 6        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 7        business group (including amounts included in gross 8        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 9        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 10        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 11        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 12        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 13        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 14        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 15        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 16        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 17        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 18        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 19        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 20        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 21        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 22        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 23        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 24        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 25        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 26        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For   SB1543- 68 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 2        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 3        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 4        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:6                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 7            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 8            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 9            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 10            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 11            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 12            with respect to such item; or13                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 14            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 15            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 16            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 17            following:18                    (a) the person during the same taxable 19                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 20                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 21                not a related member, and22                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 23                intangible expense or cost between the 24                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 25                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 26                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract   SB1543- 69 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 2                or3                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 4            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 5            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 6            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 7            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 8            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 9            writing to the application or use of an 10            alternative method of apportionment under Section 11            304(f); 12                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 13            Director from making any other adjustment 14            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 15            for any tax year beginning after the effective 16            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 17            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 18            Department and such regulations provide methods 19            and standards by which the Department will utilize 20            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 21            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 22        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 23        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 24        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 25        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 26        a person who would be a member of the same unitary   SB1543- 70 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        business group but for the fact that the person is 2        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 3        included in the unitary business group because he or 4        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 5        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 6        addition modification required by this subparagraph 7        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 8        included in base income of the unitary group for the 9        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 10        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 11        (including amounts included in gross income under 12        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 13        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 14        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 15        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 16        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 17        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 18        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 19        the addition modification required under Section 20        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 21        Act;22            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 23        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 24        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 25        Act;26            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after   SB1543- 71 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 2        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 3        for the taxable year; 4            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 5        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 6        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 7        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 8        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 9        Tax Credit Act; 10    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 11    following amounts:12            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 13        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 14        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 15        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 16        as distributions under the provisions of any 17        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 18        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 19        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 20        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 21        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 22        adopted pursuant thereto;23            (I) The valuation limitation amount;24            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 25        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 26        and included in such total for the taxable year;  SB1543- 72 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 2        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 3        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 4        taxation by this State either by reason of its 5        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 6        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 7        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 8        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 9        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 10        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 11        premium amortization;12            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 13        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 14        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 15        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 16        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 17        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 19        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 20        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 21        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 22        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 23        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 24        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 25        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 26        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this   SB1543- 73 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 2        250;3            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 4        such total which were paid by a corporation which 5        conducts business operations in a River Edge 6        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 7        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 8        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 9        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 10        the provisions of Section 250;11            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 12        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 13        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;14            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 15        such total that were paid by a corporation that 16        conducts business operations in a federally designated 17        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 18        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 19        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 20        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 21        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 22        this subparagraph (O);23            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 24        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 25        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 26        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of   SB1543- 74 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        the Internal Revenue Code;2            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 3        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 4        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 5        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 6        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 7        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 8        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 9        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 10        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 11        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 12        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 13        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 14        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 15        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 16        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 17        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 18        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 19        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 20        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 21        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 22        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 23        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 24        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 25        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 26        first recipient of such assets after their recovery   SB1543- 75 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 2        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 3        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 4        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 5        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 6        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 7        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 8        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;9            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 10        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 11        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 12        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 13        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 14        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:15                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 16            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 17            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 18            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 19            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 20            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 21            including the bonus depreciation deduction;22                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 23            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 24            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 25            0.429); and26                (3) for taxable years ending after December   SB1543- 76 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            31, 2005:2                    (i) for property on which a bonus 3                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 4                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 5                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 6                by 0.429);7                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 8                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 9                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 10                1.0;11                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 12                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 13                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 14                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 15                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 16                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 17                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 18                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 19                depreciation on that property; and20                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 21                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 22                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 23                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 24                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 25                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 26                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and   SB1543- 77 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 2                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 3                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 4            The aggregate amount deducted under this 5        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 6        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 7        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 8        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 9        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 10        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 11        Section 250;12            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 13        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 14        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 15        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 16        equal to that addition modification.17            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 18        the last day of the last tax year for which a 19        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 20        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 21        required in any taxable year to make an addition 22        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 23        equal to that addition modification. 24            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 25        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 26        one piece of property.  SB1543- 78 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 2        provisions of Section 250;3            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 19        from the provisions of Section 250; 20            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 26        outside the United States is 80% or more of that   SB1543- 79 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 3        who would be a member of the same unitary business 4        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 5        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 6        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 7        required to apportion business income under different 8        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 9        addition modification required to be made for the same 10        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 11        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 12        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 13        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 14            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible 15        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 16        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 17        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 18        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 19        for the fact that the foreign person's business 20        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 21        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 22        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 23        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 24        business group but for the fact that the person is 25        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 26        included in the unitary business group because he or   SB1543- 80 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 2        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 3        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 4        made for the same taxable year under Section 5        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 6        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 7        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 8        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 9            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 10        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 11        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 12        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 13        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 14        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt 15        from Section 250; 16            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 17        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 18        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 19        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 22        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 23        add back any insurance premiums under Section 24        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 25        that part of a reimbursement received from the 26        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense   SB1543- 81 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 2        company) that would have been taken into account as a 3        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 4        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 5        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 6        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 7        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 8        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 9        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 10        Section 250;11            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 12        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 13        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 14        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal 15        Revenue Code; and 16            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 17        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 18        operating in this State and licensed under the 19        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 20        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 21        organization operating in this State and licensed 22        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 23        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 24        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 25        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 26        added back under this subsection. The provisions of   SB1543- 82 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 2        of Section 250. 3        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 4    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 5    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 6    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 7    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 8    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 9    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 10    (d) Partnerships.11        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 12    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 13    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).14        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 15    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 16    of the following amounts:17            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 18        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 19        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 20        in the computation of taxable income;21            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 22        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 23        the taxable year;24            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 25        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the   SB1543- 83 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 2        income;3            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 4        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 5        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 6        computation of taxable income;7            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 8        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 9        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 10        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 11        the Internal Revenue Code;12            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 13        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 14        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 15        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 16        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 17        deductions taken in all taxable years under 18        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.19            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 20        the last day of the last tax year for which a 21        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 22        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 23        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 24        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 25        equal to that subtraction modification. 26            The taxpayer is required to make the addition   SB1543- 84 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        modification under this subparagraph only once with 2        respect to any one piece of property;3            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 4        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 5        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 8        member of the same unitary business group but for the 9        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 10        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 11        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 12        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 13        who would be a member of the same unitary business 14        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 15        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 16        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 17        required to apportion business income under different 18        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 19        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 20        extent that dividends were included in base income of 21        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 22        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 23        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 24        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 25        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 26        included in gross income under Section 78 of the   SB1543- 85 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 2        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 3        accrued, or incurred. 4            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 5                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 6            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 7            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 8            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 9            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 10            with respect to such interest; or11                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 12            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 13            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 14            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 15            following:16                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 17                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 18                to a person that is not a related member, and19                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 20                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 21                person did not have as a principal purpose the 22                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 23                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 24                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 25                terms; or 26                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on   SB1543- 86 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 2            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 3            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 4            and terms and the principal purpose for the 5            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 6            or 7                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 8            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 9            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 10            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 11            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 12            to the application or use of an alternative method 13            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 14                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 15            Director from making any other adjustment 16            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 17            for any tax year beginning after the effective 18            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 19            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 20            Department and such regulations provide methods 21            and standards by which the Department will utilize 22            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 23            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 24        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 25        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 26        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable   SB1543- 87 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 2        foreign person who would be a member of the same 3        unitary business group but for the fact that the 4        foreign person's business activity outside the United 5        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 6        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 8        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 9        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 10        from being included in the unitary business group 11        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 12        business income under different subsections of Section 13        304. The addition modification required by this 14        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 15        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 16        group for the same taxable year and received by the 17        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 18        business group (including amounts included in gross 19        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 21        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 22        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 23        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 24        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 25        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 26        dividends caused a reduction to the addition   SB1543- 88 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 2        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 3        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 4        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 5        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 6        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 7        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 8        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 9        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 10        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 11        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 12        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 13        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 14        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 15        similar types of intangible assets;16            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:17                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 18            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 19            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 20            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 21            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 22            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 23            with respect to such item; or24                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 25            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 26            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based   SB1543- 89 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 2            following:3                    (a) the person during the same taxable 4                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 5                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 6                not a related member, and7                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 8                intangible expense or cost between the 9                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 10                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 11                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 12                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 13                or14                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 15            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 16            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 17            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 18            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 19            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 20            writing to the application or use of an 21            alternative method of apportionment under Section 22            304(f); 23                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 24            Director from making any other adjustment 25            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 26            for any tax year beginning after the effective   SB1543- 90 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 2            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 3            Department and such regulations provide methods 4            and standards by which the Department will utilize 5            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 6            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 7        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 8        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 9        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 10        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 11        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 12        business group but for the fact that the person is 13        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 14        included in the unitary business group because he or 15        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 16        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 17        addition modification required by this subparagraph 18        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 19        included in base income of the unitary group for the 20        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 21        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 22        (including amounts included in gross income under 23        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 24        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 25        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 26        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs   SB1543- 91 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 2        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 3        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 4        the addition modification required under Section 5        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;6            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 7        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 8        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 9        Act;10            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 11        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 12        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 13        for the taxable year; 14            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 15        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 16        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 17        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 18        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 19        Tax Credit Act; 20    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 21    amounts:22            (E) The valuation limitation amount;23            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 24        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 25        and included in such total for the taxable year;26            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in   SB1543- 92 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 2        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 3        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 4        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 5        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 6        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 7        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 8        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 9        net of bond premium amortization;10            (H) Any income of the partnership which 11        constitutes personal service income as defined in 12        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 13        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 14        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 15        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 16        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 17        Section 250;18            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 19        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 20        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 21        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 22        including amounts distributable to organizations 23        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 24        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 25        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;26            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted   SB1543- 93 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 2        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 3        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 4        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 5        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 6        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 7        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 8        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 9        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 10        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 11        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 12        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 13        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 14        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 15        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 16        250;17            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 18        such total which were paid by a corporation which 19        conducts business operations in a River Edge 20        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 21        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 22        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 23        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 24        the provisions of Section 250;25            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 26        job training project established pursuant to the Real   SB1543- 94 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;2            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 3        such total that were paid by a corporation that 4        conducts business operations in a federally designated 5        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 6        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 7        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 8        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 9        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 10        this subparagraph (M);11            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 12        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 13        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 14        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 15        the Internal Revenue Code;16            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 17        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 18        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 19        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 20        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 21        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:22                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 23            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 24            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 25            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 26            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section   SB1543- 95 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 2            including the bonus depreciation deduction;3                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 4            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 5            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 6            0.429); and7                (3) for taxable years ending after December 8            31, 2005:9                    (i) for property on which a bonus 10                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 11                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 12                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 13                by 0.429);14                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 15                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 16                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 17                1.0;18                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 19                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 20                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 21                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 22                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 23                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 24                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 25                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 26                depreciation on that property; and  SB1543- 96 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 3                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 4                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 5                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 6                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 7                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 8                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 9                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 10                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 11            The aggregate amount deducted under this 12        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 13        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 14        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 15        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 16        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 17        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 18        Section 250;19            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 20        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 21        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 22        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 23        equal to that addition modification.24            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 25        the last day of the last tax year for which a 26        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property   SB1543- 97 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 2        required in any taxable year to make an addition 3        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 4        equal to that addition modification. 5            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 6        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 7        one piece of property.8            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 9        provisions of Section 250;10            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 11        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 12        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 13        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 14        modification with respect to such transaction under 15        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 16        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 17        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 18        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 19        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 20        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 21        that is required to make an addition modification with 22        respect to such transaction under Section 23        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 24        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 25        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 26        from Section 250;   SB1543- 98 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 2        into account for the taxable year (net of the 3        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 4        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 5        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 6        for the fact that the foreign person's business 7        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 8        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 9        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 10        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 11        business group but for the fact that the person is 12        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 13        included in the unitary business group because he or 14        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 15        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 16        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 17        made for the same taxable year under Section 18        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 19        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 20        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 21            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 22        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 23        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 24        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 25        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 26        for the fact that the foreign person's business   SB1543- 99 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 2        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 3        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 4        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 5        business group but for the fact that the person is 6        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 7        included in the unitary business group because he or 8        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 9        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 10        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 11        made for the same taxable year under Section 12        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 13        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 14        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 15        Section 250; 16            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   SB1543- 100 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 4        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; and 6            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 8        operating in this State and licensed under the 9        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 10        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 11        organization operating in this State and licensed 12        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 13        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 14        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 15        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 16        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250.  19    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.20        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 21    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 22    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 23    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 24    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 25    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax   SB1543- 101 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 2    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 3    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 4    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 5    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 6    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 7    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 8    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 9    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 10    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 11    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 12    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 13    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 14    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 15    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 16    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 17    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 18    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 19    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 20    addition modification must be made under those 21    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 22    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 23    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 24    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 25    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 26    Internal Revenue Code.  SB1543- 102 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 2    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 3    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:4            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 5        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 6        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 7        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 8        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 9        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 10        Internal Revenue Code;11            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 12        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 13        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 14        insurance company taxable income;15            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 16        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 17        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 18        investment company taxable income;19            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 20        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 21        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 22        real estate investment trust taxable income;23            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 24        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 25        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 26        return for the taxable year for federal income tax   SB1543- 103 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 2        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 3        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 4        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 5        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 6        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 7        determined as if the election provided by Section 8        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 9        effect for all such years;10            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 11        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 12        organization determined in accordance with the 13        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 14        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 15        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 16        activities against income from nonpatronage 17        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 18        association may make an election to follow its federal 19        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 20        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 21        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 22        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 23        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 24        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 25        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 26        the losses are incurred. The election shall be   SB1543- 104 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        effective for all taxable years with original returns 2        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 3        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 4        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 5        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 6        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 7        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 8        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 9        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 10        requirements for documenting the elections and any 11        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 12        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 13        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 14        existing law; 15            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 16        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 17        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 18        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 19        of such corporation determined in accordance with 20        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 21        that taxable income shall take into account those 22        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 23        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 24        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 25        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 26        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have   SB1543- 105 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 2        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 3        such corporation determined in accordance with the 4        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 5        1982; and6            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 7        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 8        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 9        income shall take into account those items which are 10        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 11        but which would be taken into account by an individual 12        in calculating his taxable income.13        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 14    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 15    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 16    business has been classified as business income and in a 17    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 18    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 19    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 20    related to that asset or business that generated the 21    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 22    business income in the year of the disposition of the 23    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 24    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 25    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 26    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment   SB1543- 106 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 2    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 3    preceding taxable years.  4    (f) Valuation limitation amount.5        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 6    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 7    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:8            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 9        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 10        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 11        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 12        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 13        plus14            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 15        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 16        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 17        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 18        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 19        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 20        of such gain included in the amount determined under 21        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).22        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.23            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 24        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 25        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation   SB1543- 107 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 2        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 3        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 4        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 5        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 6        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 7        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 8        such property.9            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 10        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 11        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 12        amount for such property is that amount which bears 13        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 14        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 15        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 16        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 17        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 18        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 19        period for the property.20            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 21        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 22        purposes of this paragraph. 23    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 24otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 25to be deducted more than once.   SB1543- 108 -LRB104 10140 HLH 20212 b1    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 2this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 3the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 4account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 5taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 6year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 7computation of base income and net income under this Act for 8such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 9August 1, 1969 or otherwise.10(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 11102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 1212-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 13Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 14Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 15eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.